Utah statutes.
61-2a-2.   Purpose -- Definitions.
(1)  The purposes of this chapter are as follows:
(a) (i)  This chapter creates the Real Estate Education, Research, and
Recovery Fund to reimburse the public out of the fund for damages up to
$15,000 caused by a real estate licensee in a real estate transaction as
provided in Subsection 61-2a-5(1).
(ii)  This chapter applies to damages caused by an individual licensee.
Reimbursement may not be made for a judgment against a corporation,
partnership, association, or other legal entity.
(b)  This chapter provides revenue for improving the real estate profession
through education and research with the goal of making licensees more
responsible to the public.
(2)  For purposes of this chapter:
(a)  "Commission" means the Real Estate Commission.
(b)  "Division" means the Division of Real Estate.
(c)  "Fund" means the Real Estate Education, Research, and Recovery Fund
created in Section 61-2a-3.
(d)  "Judgment" includes a criminal restitution judgment award.
